Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.110

Licensure—Examination.

(1) The date and location of the examination shall be established by the secretary. Applicants who have been found by the secretary to meet the other requirements for licensure shall be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the application. However, the applicant shall not be scheduled for any examination taking place sooner than sixty days after the application is filed.

(2) The secretary shall examine each applicant, by means determined most effective, on subjects appropriate to the scope of practice. Such examinations shall be limited to the purpose of determining whether the applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently, and shall meet generally accepted standards of fairness and validity for licensure examinations.

(3) All examinations shall be conducted by the secretary, and all grading of the examinations shall be under fair and wholly impartial methods.

(4) Any applicant who fails to make the required grade in the first examination is entitled to take up to three subsequent examinations, upon compliance with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 and such remedial education as is deemed necessary.

(5) Applicants who meet the educational criteria as established by the national board for respiratory care to sit for the national board for respiratory care's advanced practitioner exams, or who have been issued the registered respiratory therapist credential by the national board for respiratory care, shall be considered to have met the educational criteria of this chapter, provided the criteria and credential continue to be recognized by the secretary as equal to or greater than the licensure standards in Washington. Applicants must have verification submitted directly from the national board for respiratory care to the department.

(6) The secretary may approve an examination prepared and administered by a private testing agency or association of credentialing boards for use by an applicant in meeting the licensure requirement.

[ 2004 c 262 s 14; 1997 c 334 s 9; 1996 c 191 s 76; 1991 c 3 s 234; 1987 c 415 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 262 ss 13 and 14: See note following RCW 18.89.050.

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.